RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.aff
SFX Y dė      džiusiųjų       dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiesiems    dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiuosius    dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiaisiais   dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiuosiuose  dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusioji       dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiosios     dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiajai      dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiąją       dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiąja       dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiojoje     dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiojoj      dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiosioms    dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiąsias     dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiosiomis   dė        
SFX Y dė      džiusiosiose    dė        
SFX Y o       imas            o         
SFX Y o       imo             o         
SFX Y o       imui            o         
SFX Y o       imą             o         
SFX Y o       imu             o         
SFX Y o       ime             o         
SFX Y o       imai            o         
SFX Y o       imų             o         
SFX Y o       imams           o         
SFX Y o       imus            o         
SFX Y o       imais           o         
SFX Y o       imuose          o         
SFX Y ė       ymas            ė         
SFX Y ė       ymo             ė         
SFX Y ė       ymui            ė         
SFX Y ė       ymą             ė         
SFX Y ė       ymu             ė         
SFX Y ė       yme             ė         
SFX Y ė       ymai            ė         
SFX Y ė       ymų             ė         
SFX Y ė       ymams           ė         
SFX Y ė       ymus            ė         
SFX Y ė       ymais           ė         
SFX Y ė       ymuose          ė         
SFX Y osi     imasis          osi       
SFX Y osi     imosi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imuisi          osi       
SFX Y osi     imąsi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imusi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imesi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imaisi          osi       
SFX Y osi     imųsi           osi       
SFX Y osi     imamsis         osi       
SFX Y osi     imusis          osi       
SFX Y osi     imaisis         osi       
SFX Y osi     imuosesi        osi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymasis          ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymosi           ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymuisi          ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymąsi           ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymusi           ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymesi           ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymaisi          ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymųsi           ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymamsis         ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymusis          ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymaisis         ėsi       
SFX Y ėsi     ymuosesi        ėsi       
