RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
aitļæ½si/Y
aiļæ½ļæ½si/Y
ambrijo/NXY
anglijo/NXYk
apdalijo/NXY
apgirdļæ½/SXY
apgniauļæ½ļæ½/NPSXY
apibarstļæ½/SXY
apibraiļæ½ļæ½/SXY
apibubijo/NXY
apiplļæ½ļæ½ļæ½/NPXY
apipļæ½dļæ½/NXY
apipustļæ½/NXY
apkamļæ½ļæ½/SXY
apkramtļæ½/NXY
apmaigļæ½/SXY
apmaudijo/NXY
apsidairļæ½/NXY
apsigirdļæ½/SXY
apsiibarstļæ½/SXY
apsiiplikļæ½/SXY
apsikamļæ½ļæ½/SXY
apsikraustļæ½/SXY
apsimļæ½stļæ½/SXY
apsitaļæ½kļæ½/SXY
apsiuostļæ½/SXY
aptaļæ½ļæ½/SXY
aptvarstļæ½/SXY
apvilgļæ½/SXY
ardļæ½si/PY
aļæ½kļæ½si/Y
atidaigstļæ½/NXY
atidangstļæ½/SXY
atitaisļæ½/NXY
atkraustļæ½/SXY
atsibastļæ½/NXY
atsiidalijo/SXY
atsiidarļæ½/SXY
atsikraustļæ½/SXY
atsipraļæ½ļæ½/NXY
atsivijo/NSXY
aukļæ½si/Y
badļæ½/NSXYdefijklpqrwx
baidļæ½/NSXYbcdefjklpqrwx
bakijo/NXYjl
baldļæ½si/PY
bandļæ½si/Y
barstļæ½si/Y
bizijo/NXY
blaivļæ½si/PY
blaļæ½kļæ½si/PY
braidļæ½/NSXYabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
braiļæ½ļæ½/NPSXYacdefhjknopqrstvwx
braukļæ½si/PY
brinkļæ½/NXY
bugdļæ½/NXYdgjkl
but/SXYabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
ļæ½iauļæ½ļæ½/NPXYcdeghjkl
ļæ½iulpļæ½/NPSXYacdefjklov
ļæ½iustijosi/Y
daigļæ½/NXYk
dairļæ½si/PY
dalijosi/Y
dangstļæ½si/Y
dantijosi/Y
darļæ½si/Y
darkļæ½si/PY
dauļæ½ļæ½si/PY
daļæ½ļæ½si/Y
dļæ½stļæ½si/Y
drabstļæ½/NSXYadefjklmprtvwx
draibstļæ½/NXY
draikļæ½si/PY
draskļæ½si/PY
dribdļæ½/NXY
dļæ½lijo/NXYl
dļæ½myjo/SXYacdegijklmnopqrstuvwx
durstļæ½/NXYdfk
dvailijosi/Y
dļæ½iaustļæ½si/Y
galabijosi/Y
ganļæ½si/Y
gaubstļæ½si/Y
gļæ½dijo/NPSXYfkrvw
gelnijo/NXYejl
gijo/NXYabcdefjklo
gildļæ½/NXYk
gimdļæ½si/Y
ginļæ½ijo/SXYefhprtuvw
girdļæ½/NXYdefhjkl
gydļæ½/NSXYabdefjklmpqrx
glabstļæ½/NXY
glaistļæ½/NXYaefhkltvwx
glamļæ½ļæ½/NXYf
glaubstļæ½/NXY
glaudļæ½si/PY
glaustļæ½si/Y
gliaudļæ½si/Y
gliaumijosi/Y
glostļæ½/NSXYadefhijklmnpruvwx
gnaibļæ½/NXYadefjkl
gniauļæ½ļæ½/NPXYbfj
gniuļæ½dļæ½/NXYk
gobstļæ½si/Y
graibļæ½si/Y
graibstļæ½si/Y
gramdļæ½/NXYadjk
grandļæ½/NXYadfjk
grļæ½ļæ½ļæ½/NXYjk
grļæ½bstļæ½/NXYadefk
grizijo/NXY
grobstļæ½si/Y
grumdļæ½si/Y
gundļæ½/NXYcjkw
gvaldļæ½/NXYd
ibarstļæ½si/Y
idalijosi/Y
idarļæ½si/Y
ļæ½gijo/SXY
ļæ½kamļæ½ļæ½/NXY
ļæ½kraustļæ½/SXY
imstļæ½/NPSXYr
irstļæ½/NXY
iļæ½aiļæ½ļæ½/SXY
iļæ½ļæ½iustijo/SXY
iļæ½dļæ½stļæ½/SXY
iļæ½galabijo/SXY
ļæ½siganļæ½/SXY
ļæ½siguldļæ½/SXY
ļæ½sikraustļæ½/SXY
ļæ½sistebeilijo/NXY
iļæ½kaiļæ½ļæ½/NPSXY
iļæ½kinkļæ½/SXY
iļæ½lijo/SXY
iļæ½murdļæ½/SXY
iļæ½nuodijo/NXY
iļæ½raizgļæ½/SXY
iļæ½siaiļæ½ļæ½/SXY
iļæ½siblandļæ½/NXY
iļæ½sidairļæ½/NXY
iļæ½sidļæ½stļæ½/SXY
iļæ½sigalabijo/SXY
iļæ½siginļæ½ijo/NXY
iļæ½sikaiļæ½ļæ½/SXY
iļæ½sikinkļæ½/SXY
iļæ½silijo/SXY
iļæ½simurdļæ½/SXY
iļæ½siplikļæ½/SXY
iļæ½sisamstļæ½/SXY
iļæ½siugdļæ½/SXY
iļæ½ugdļæ½/SXY
iļæ½vijo/NXY
iļæ½braiļæ½ļæ½/NXY
jodļæ½/NPSXYdefilr
junkļæ½/NXYbce
juodijo/NXYefl
kaiļæ½ļæ½/NPXYejkl
kaitļæ½/NPSXYcefjklorx
kalstļæ½/NXYk
kamļæ½ļæ½si/Y
kapstļæ½/NPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kardļæ½/NXYl
kargļæ½/NXYl
karpļæ½si/Y
karstļæ½si/PY
kasļæ½si/PY
kaustļæ½/NXYahjkl
kerļæ½ijo/NXYbn
kildļæ½/NXY
kinkļæ½si/Y
kirdļæ½si/Y
kiurdļæ½/NXYi
klaipļæ½si/Y
klastļæ½si/PY
klausļæ½si/PY
klykdļæ½/NXY
klostļæ½si/PY
knaibļæ½/NXYbdf
knaisļæ½si/Y
kniubdļæ½/NXYk
konfnzijosi/Y
kontuzijo/NXY
kraikļæ½/NXYadfl
kraipļæ½si/Y
kraitļæ½si/Y
kramtļæ½/SXYadefhjkq
krapļæ½tļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
kratļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhjklnpqruvwx
kraustļæ½/NXYi
kriauļæ½ļæ½/DNXY
krikdļæ½/NXYdk
krikļæ½tijosi/Y
krļæ½mijosi/Y
kļæ½nijo/NXYt
kurpļæ½/DNPXY
laidļæ½/NSXYjklwx
laigļæ½/NXYf
laikļæ½si/PY
laistļæ½si/Y
laiļæ½ļæ½si/PY
lakstļæ½si/PY
lamdļæ½si/Y
lamļæ½ļæ½/NXY
lankļæ½/NSXYabfjmn
lankstļæ½/DNPSXYabcdefhijklnptuvwx
lasļæ½/NXYdj
laupļæ½/NPSXYabdeijmnp
lauļæ½ļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lebedijo/NXY
lijo/NXYabcdefhijklopqrtv
likdļæ½/NXY
lipdļæ½si/Y
liudijo/NXYf
lydļæ½si/Y
lodļæ½/NXYk
lopļæ½si/Y
maigļæ½si/Y
mainļæ½si/Y
maldļæ½/NXYaefh
malļæ½ļæ½/NXY
manļæ½si/PY
mankļæ½si/Y
mļæ½stļæ½/NXYadfhkw
mļæ½stļæ½si/Y
matļæ½si/PY
maudļæ½si/Y
maustļæ½/NXYefj
mazgļæ½/NXYbdjkl
meilijo/NXYd
mļæ½tļæ½/NPSXYacdefhijklmpqruvw
migdļæ½/NXYfkl
mindļæ½/NXYafjkl
minkļæ½/NXYdjkl
mintijo/NXY
mirkļæ½si/Y
mokļæ½si/Y
muistļæ½/NPSXYfkrw
murdļæ½/NXYcejkv
murgdļæ½/NXY
mļæ½rijo/NXYadjl
murkdļæ½/NXYclv
nardļæ½/NSXYdfv
narļæ½ļæ½/NXYdfkvx
narstļæ½/NXYdkl
niurkļæ½/NPXYdejkl
novijo/NXYel
nuļæ½iustijo/SXY
nuginļæ½ijo/NXY
nukarpļæ½/SXY
numindļæ½/SXY
nuramdļæ½/SXY
nusagstļæ½/SXY
nusibastļæ½/NXY
nusiblandļæ½/NXY
nusiļæ½iustijo/SXY
nusigrandļæ½/SXY
nusikraustļæ½/SXY
nusiodijo/SXY
nusiraļæ½kļæ½/SXY
nusiļæ½aipļæ½/NXY
nusisikapstļæ½/SXY
nusitaļæ½kļæ½/SXY
nusivijo/NSXY
nutaļæ½kļæ½/SXY
nuvaldļæ½/NXY
odļæ½si/Y
p/NXY
paļæ½iauļæ½ļæ½/NPSXY
paguldļæ½/SXY
pairstļæ½/SXY
paiļæ½ļæ½/NSXYadefhjklpqrtv
paistļæ½/NXYfjk
pakamļæ½ļæ½/NXY
pakaustļæ½/SXY
pakramtļæ½/NXY
pakrikdļæ½si/Y
pamurdļæ½/SXY
panarļæ½ļæ½/SXY
papaļæ½ļæ½/SXY
paraļæ½kļæ½/SXY
parsiaitļæ½/SXY
parsiaļæ½ļæ½/SXY
parsiaukļæ½/SXY
parsikraustļæ½/SXY
parsiļæ½kļæ½/SXY
parvijo/NXY
paļæ½ļæ½/NXYd
pasibraukļæ½/PSXY
pasiļæ½iauļæ½ļæ½/SXY
pasidievaļæ½ijo/NXY
pasiginļæ½ijo/NXY
pasigundļæ½/SXY
pasikaiļæ½ļæ½/SXY
pasikaustļæ½/SXY
pasikivirļæ½ijo/NXY
pasimirkļæ½/SXY
pasimļæ½rijo/SXY
pasiniaukstļæ½/NXY
pasipaļæ½ļæ½/SXY
pasirļæ½ļæ½ļæ½/NXY
pasisamdļæ½/SXY
pasispjaudļæ½/SXY
pasisvaidļæ½/SXY
pasitaupļæ½/SXY
paskabļæ½/SXY
paspjaudļæ½/SXY
pasvaidļæ½/SXY
pataupļæ½/SXY
pavartļæ½/DSXY
pelijo/NXYfjk
pelnļæ½si/Y
perkraustļæ½/SXY
perpraļæ½ļæ½/NXY
persikrikļæ½tijo/SXY
pervijo/NXY
pildļæ½si/PY
pydļæ½/NXY
pjaustļæ½/NSXYacdefjklmoqrvw
pjudļæ½/NXYdfk
plaukļæ½/NPXYabcdefghijkl
plļæ½nijo/NXYd
plļæ½ļæ½ļæ½si/PY
plikļæ½si/Y
plukdļæ½/NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plunijo/NXYd
prapuldļæ½/NXY
praļæ½ļæ½si/PY
prasiblaivļæ½/NXY
prasigiedrijo/NXY
praļæ½aidļæ½/NPXY
pribraukļæ½/NPSXY
prieļæ½pastatļæ½/NXY
prigliaudļæ½/SXY
prikamļæ½ļæ½/NXY
pripraļæ½ļæ½/NXY
prisibastļæ½/NXY
prisigirdļæ½/SXY
prisigrobstļæ½/SXY
prisiļæ½aipļæ½/NXY
prisitvanijo/SXY
pritemdļæ½/NXY
priturlijo/NXY
priuostļæ½/SXY
prosijo/NXY
pļæ½kijo/NXY
purtļæ½/NPSXYdefjkqrvw
pustļæ½/NSXYbcdefjklpr
raikļæ½/NXYefjk
raitļæ½si/PY
raiļæ½ļæ½si/Y
raizgļæ½si/Y
ramdļæ½si/Y
ramstļæ½si/Y
rangļæ½si/PY
raļæ½ļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
raļæ½kļæ½/NXYdj
raudonijo/NXYcef
raukļæ½si/PY
raustļæ½/NXY
rļæ½kdļæ½si/Y
rijosi/Y
rikdļæ½si/Y
rodļæ½/NPSXYabcdefjlmopqrvw
romijo/NXYd
rļæ½kļæ½/NXYadefghijklmpvx
sagstļæ½/NXYj
saikstļæ½/NPSXY
sakļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhjklmnorvwx
ļæ½aknijo/NPSXYo
saldļæ½/DNXY
ļæ½aldļæ½si/Y
samdļæ½si/Y
samstļæ½si/Y
sarmatijosi/Y
ļæ½audļæ½si/Y
ļæ½ļæ½si/Yf
siaustļæ½/NXY
sijo/NXYb
ļæ½ildļæ½/NSXYabcefhjklmnrtvwx
ļæ½irdijo/NXYvx
siļæ½lļæ½/DNSXYcfjorv
siulpstļæ½/NXY
siundļæ½/NXYl
siurbstļæ½/NXY
skabļæ½si/Y
skaidļæ½si/Y
skaitļæ½si/PY
skaldļæ½/NSXYabcdefghijkmopruvw
skalijo/NXY
skardļæ½/NXY
skiepijosi/Y
skirstļæ½si/PY
sklaidļæ½si/Y
sklambļæ½/NXY
sklastļæ½/NXY
skliaustļæ½/NXY
skvarbļæ½/NXYk
ļæ½lakstļæ½/NXYafkmr
slankļæ½/NXY
slapstļæ½/NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
slaugļæ½/DNXYadf
ļæ½liauļæ½ļæ½/NPSXYabcdefghijkl
slugdļæ½/NXYek
smaigļæ½/NXYejk
smaigstļæ½si/PY
ļæ½maiļæ½ļæ½/NXYr
smaukļæ½/NPXY
smukdļæ½/NXYek
spandļæ½/NXYf
spardļæ½si/PY
spaudļæ½si/PY
spjaudļæ½si/Y
springdļæ½/NXY
stabdļæ½/NSXYafjklrw
statļæ½si/PY
stebeilijosi/Y
strigdļæ½/NXY
stumdļæ½si/PY
suadļæ½/SXY
sļæ½dļæ½/NXYacdehjkl
sudļæ½iaustļæ½/SXY
suglamļæ½ļæ½/SXY
sugundļæ½/SXY
sukarpļæ½/SXY
suklidļæ½/NXY
sukraustļæ½/SXY
sulydļæ½/SXY
sumaustļæ½/SXY
supaļæ½ļæ½/SXY
suraļæ½kļæ½/SXY
susamdļæ½/SXY
susiginļæ½ijo/NXY
susigundļæ½/SXY
susikinkļæ½/SXY
susilipdļæ½/SXY
susimastļæ½/NSXY
susiraizgļæ½/SXY
susisagstļæ½/SXY
susitaupļæ½/SXY
susivaidijo/SXY
sutaļæ½kļæ½/SXY
sutvardļæ½/SXY
svaidļæ½/NXYdej
svarstļæ½/NXYaefhjk
taikstļæ½si/PY
talaļæ½ijo/NXY
tapļæ½/NXYel
tļæ½sļæ½/NPSXYadfjklmrw
taļæ½kļæ½/NXYj
tauzijo/NXYj
temdļæ½si/Y
terlijosi/PY
tirpļæ½/NXYk
tramdļæ½/NSXYajkw
traukļæ½/NPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrvwx
trukdļæ½/NSXYfklw
turlijosi/Y
tvardļæ½/NXY
tvarstļæ½/NXYdek
tvilkļæ½si/Y
ugdļæ½si/Y
uļæ½adļæ½/SXY
uļæ½kramtļæ½/NXY
uļæ½maustļæ½/SXY
uļæ½rļæ½kļæ½/SXY
uļæ½sikamļæ½ļæ½/SXY
uļæ½simaustļæ½/SXY
uļæ½sisagstļæ½/SXY
uļæ½valdļæ½/NXY
vaikļæ½si/PY
vaisļæ½si/Y
valļæ½si/Y
valkstļæ½si/PY
vangstļæ½/NPSXY
varpļæ½/NXYd
vartļæ½/NSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
velijo/NXY
vienijosi/Y
vilgļæ½si/Y
virkdļæ½/NXYefij
vystļæ½/NSXYacdefhkp
zambatijo/NXY
ļæ½argdļæ½/NXY
ļæ½argstļæ½si/Y
ļæ½ergdļæ½/NXY
ļæ½lugdļæ½/NXYk
ļæ½udļæ½si/Y
ļæ½vigdļæ½/NXY
